Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB97.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Human trafficking" has the same meaning as KRS 529.010;
(b) "Legal standing" means the right or capacity of a victim service provider to
file legal claims based upon the provider's direct involvement in anti-
trafficking efforts or victim assistance;
(c) "Victim of human trafficking" has the same meaning as KRS 529.010; and
(d) "Victim service provider" means a nongovernmental, nonprofit
organization established under KRS Chapter 273 or 273A that is actively
engaged in providing services to or advocacy for victims of human
trafficking, including counseling, rehabilitation, legal assistance, and
support with reintegration into society.
(2) (a) A victim service provider shall have legal standing to file a civil action
against any defendant convicted of any human trafficking offense under
KRS Chapter 529 if the victim of the offense has not proceeded as provided
in KRS 431.082 or any other applicable statute or common law right of
action.
(b) Before initiating any civil action under this section, the provider shall give
notice to any human trafficking victim directly impacted by the human
trafficking actions of the defendant.
(c) Each victim shall be given a reasonable opportunity to join the civil action
as a plaintiff.
(3) If a victim elects to not join the civil action as a plaintiff, the victim service
provider shall retain the right to proceed independently in its own name.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/31/2025 9:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 200
(4) Any victim service provider proceeding under this section shall give written notice
to the Attorney General of the proceeding, and the Attorney General may join as
a plaintiff to the action.
(5) The victim service provider shall maintain comprehensive documentation of the
provided services to victims of human trafficking and of the process of notifying
and inviting the victims to join the legal action. The documentation shall be
available for review by the Attorney General upon request, and by the court as
determined by the court.
(6) A prevailing plaintiff shall be entitled to all damages provided under KRS
431.082.
(7) Money damages received under this section shall be distributed to any
participating victim and victim service provider in amounts determined by the
jury or the court if the matter was tried without a jury. Any remaining damages
shall be remitted to the human trafficking victims fund established in KRS
529.140.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/31/2025 9:14 AM Jacketed